Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 3 Registration of Vehicles

31-3-1.
Operation of unregistered vehicle.

It is a civil violation for any person to operate, or for an owner knowingly to permit to be operated, upon any highway any vehicle of a type required to be registered under this chapter which is not registered and for which the appropriate fee has not been paid or not registered as required in any other state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-1

; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 201, § 1.

31-3-2.
Vehicles subject to registration.

Every motor vehicle, trailer, semi-trailer, pole trailer, motorized camper, tent trailer, travel trailer, pick-up coach, and pick-up camper, owned by a resident of this state when operated or drawn upon a highway within this state for a period of thirty (30) days, shall be subject to the registration provisions of chapters 3 — 9 of this title except:

Any vehicle operated upon a highway in conformance with the provisions of the chapters relating to manufacturers, transporters, dealers, lien holders, or nonresidents;

Any vehicle that is operated upon a highway only for the purpose of crossing the highway but not along the highway from one property to another;

Any farm vehicle, whether or not of a type otherwise subject to registration under this chapter, that is only incidentally operated upon a highway. For purposes of this title, the phrase “incidentally operated upon a highway” shall mean the operation upon a highway of a slow-moving motor vehicle that is designed and used primarily as a farm implement for drawing plows, mowing machines, and other implements of husbandry, between agricultural operations owned or managed by the owner of the motor vehicle. Unless the incidental operation is only for purposes of crossing the highway but not traveling along it, the farm vehicle engaged in the incidental operation shall display a “Slow Moving Vehicle” emblem in a manner that complies with requirements established by the division of motor vehicles;

Any special mobile equipment as defined in §

31-1-9

;

Any vehicle that is propelled exclusively by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires, though not operated upon rails.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 2; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-2

; P.L. 1959, ch. 123, § 2; P.L. 1966, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 217, § 2; P.L. 1976, ch. 64, § 3; P.L. 1978, ch. 377, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 589, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 401, § 1.

31-3-2.1.
Out-of-state motorized bicycles.

Out-of-state residents owning motorized bicycles, whose state of residence does not require the registration of those vehicles, shall register the vehicles in the state of Rhode Island and upon payment of the registration fee shall be issued stickers to be placed on the vehicle evidencing registration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 327, § 2.

31-3-2.2.
Registration of motorcycles, motorized bicycles, and motorized tricycles.

Every motorcycle, motorized bicycle, and motorized tricycle owned by a resident of this state shall be subject to the registration provisions of chapters 3 — 9 of this title whether the motorcycle, motorized bicycle, or motorized tricycle is operated or drawn upon a highway within this state or upon private property. An electric personal assistive mobility device (“EPAMD”) and electric motorized bicycles shall not be required to register under this chapter; provided, however, that an EPAMD and/or electric motorized bicycles shall not be operated in this state by a person under the age of sixteen (16) years.

Notwithstanding any general law to the contrary, cities and towns are empowered to enact ordinances that permit the use and regulation of electric personal assistive mobility devices (“EPAMD”).

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 589, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 56, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 136, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 397, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 304, § 1.

Applicability.

P.L. 2002, ch. 136, § 4 provides that the amendment to this section by that act takes effect upon passage [June 15, 2002] but until further action by the general assembly the operation of an EPAMD on sidewalks, bicycle paths and trails is limited to government agencies, including law enforcement personnel in the performance of their duties.

P.L. 2002, ch. 397, § 4 provides that the amendment to this section by that act takes effect upon passage [June 28, 2002] but until further action by the general assembly the operation of an EPAMD on sidewalks, bicycle paths and trails is limited to government agencies, including law enforcement personnel in the performance of their duties.

31-3-3.
Application for registration.

Every owner of a vehicle subject to registration under this chapter shall apply to the division of motor vehicles for the registration of it using the appropriate form or forms furnished by the division of motor vehicles. Every application shall bear the signature of the owner written with pen and ink and the signature shall be acknowledged by the owner before a person authorized to administer oaths and the application shall contain:

The name, city or town of bona fide residence, actual residence address and mail address of the owner as appearing on the owner’s motor vehicle operator’s license or state identification card issued pursuant to the provisions of chapter 8 of title 3, or business address of the owner if a firm, association, or if a corporation, the name of the city or town in which the vehicle is physically and primarily housed. For purposes of this section “physically and primarily housed” is defined as that city or town in which the vehicle is housed for a period or periods of time greater than in any other city or town in the state of Rhode Island. The division of motor vehicles may substitute other indicators of residence when necessary.

A description of the vehicle, including, insofar as this specified data may exist with respect to a given vehicle, the make, model, type of body, the number of cylinders, the serial number of the vehicle, and the engine or other number of the vehicle. In the event a vehicle is designed, constructed, converted, or rebuilt for the transportation of property, the application shall include a statement of its capacity in terms of maximum gross vehicle weight rating as authorized by the manufacturer of the chassis or the complete vehicle.

A statement whether liability insurance is carried on the vehicle, and, if there is liability insurance, the name of the carrier, policy number, and effective dates of the policy.

Any further information as may reasonably be required by the division of motor vehicles to enable it to determine whether the vehicle is lawfully entitled to registration.

The exact mileage reading from the motor vehicle on the date of application.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-3

; P.L. 1961, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 392, § 4; P.L. 1991, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 392, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 28, § 1.

31-3-3.1.
Notice to division of motor vehicles of vehicle lease agreement.

Every owner of a vehicle subject to registration or renewal of registration under this chapter shall notify the division of motor vehicles, at the time of registration of the vehicle on the proper registration form, of any agreement to lease the registered vehicle for a period of six (6) months duration, or longer, except for those commercial motor vehicles covered under the federal motor carrier safety regulations, 49 CFR Part 390 as may be amended from time to time.

The division of motor vehicles shall cause the name and address of the lessee as well as the owner of the vehicle to be entered on the division of motor vehicles records as provided in this chapter.

The name and address of both the owner and lessee shall be made available by the division of motor vehicles upon a registration inquiry from any law enforcement officer, department, or agency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 357, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 475, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 82, § 1.

31-3-4.
Proof of payment of sales or use tax.

Each person, before obtaining an original or transferral registration for a motor vehicle in this state, shall furnish evidence that any tax due with reference to the motor vehicle pursuant to the provisions of chapters 18 and 19 of title 44 has been paid in accordance with regulations prescribed by the tax administrator, and on any forms that are approved by the tax administrator and the state administrator of the division of motor vehicles. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall, upon the request of the tax administrator, and after due hearing by the tax administrator, suspend or revoke a motor vehicle registration of any person who fails to pay any tax due in connection with the sale, storage, use, or other consumption of the motor vehicle pursuant to the provisions of chapters 18 and 19.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1887, art. 2, § 57; P.L. 1956, ch. 3740, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-4

.

31-3-5.
Grounds for refusal of registration.

The division of motor vehicles shall refuse registration or any transfer of registration upon any of the following grounds:

That the application contains any false or fraudulent statement, or that the applicant has failed to furnish required information, or reasonable additional information requested by the division of motor vehicles, or that the applicant is not entitled to the issuance of registration of the vehicle under chapters 3 — 9 of this title;

That the vehicle is mechanically unfit or unsafe to be operated upon the highways;

That the division of motor vehicles has reasonable ground to believe that the vehicle is a stolen or embezzled vehicle, or that the granting of registration would constitute a fraud against the rightful owner;

That the registration of the vehicle stands suspended or revoked for any reason as provided in the motor vehicle laws of this state;

That the vehicle has been reported by any city or town to the division of motor vehicles as having unpaid fines in the aggregate amount of two hundred dollars ($200) or more, including any and all interest, penalties, or other monetary amount that may be imposed for failure to pay the fines by a specified date; provided, the registration shall be issued upon presentation of proof of payment of the outstanding fines, including any and all interest, penalties, or other monetary amount owed to the cities or towns reporting the unpaid fines. When the division of motor vehicles denies a registration to any person pursuant to this subsection, the city or town requesting the denial of registration shall add a five-dollar ($5.00) fee to the aggregate value of the sum of the fines and, upon payment, shall transmit the fee to the division of motor vehicles. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any vehicle owned by a rental company, as defined in §

31-34.1-1

;

That the vehicle does not comply with regulations promulgated pursuant to §

23-23-5(18)

;

That the vehicle does not comply with the provisions of chapter 47.1 of this title and any rules and regulations promulgated under that chapter;

That a commercial motor vehicle is being operated by a commercial motor carrier that has been prohibited from operating in interstate commerce by a federal agency with authority to do so under federal law; or

That the registered owner of a vehicle failed to pay the required toll amounts, administrative fees, and fines as prescribed in §

24-12-37

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-5

; P.L. 1980, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 221, § 8; P.L. 1987, ch. 448, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 361, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 254, § 3; P.L. 2000, ch. 276, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 193, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 383, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 397, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 349, § 1.

31-3-5.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 163, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1978, ch. 341, § 1.

31-3-6.
List of vehicles on which taxes delinquent — Denial of registration.

On or before October 31 in each year, the collector of taxes of each city or town shall furnish the division of motor vehicles, with a listing showing the registration plate numbers, names, and addresses of the taxpayers of the city or town whose personal property and/or excise tax on motor vehicles, the assessment of which were made the prior December 31 in the case of the property tax, and the tax levied in the current year in the case of the excise tax, remained unpaid as of the date of the list. Subsequently, the collector of taxes in each city or town shall, at the times and in the manner prescribed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, furnish to the division of motor vehicles the names and addresses of those persons whose names appeared on that list who have subsequently paid the personal property, and/or excise taxes on motor vehicles, and the division shall remove from the list the names and addresses of those persons. No city or town treasurer or tax collector shall refuse to accept personal property, and/or excise taxes on a motor vehicle, or refuse to remove the names and addresses of the owners of the vehicle from the list because of any other taxes owing the city or town. No person, corporation, partnership, joint stock company, or association whose name appears on the list and whose name has not been subsequently removed from the list shall be permitted to register any motor vehicle until all the excise and attendant penalties have been paid in full and the payment has been certified to the division of motor vehicles by the tax collector. The provisions of this section shall not be construed so as to prevent the payment of taxes on motor vehicles in quarterly installments as provided in chapter 5 of title 44. The provisions of this section shall apply in all respects in the case of taxes assessed upon motor vehicles by any fire district.

The division of motor vehicles (the “division”) shall provide a written notice to those persons or other taxpayers (the “person”) whose name appears on the list generated in accordance with the provisions of subsection (a). This notice shall include:

The name of the municipality or other entity providing the person’s name to the division; and

A statement that the person identified on the list shall not be permitted to register any motor vehicle until the tax matter has been resolved and the person’s name is removed from the list as provided for under subsection (a).

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 7; P.L. 1956, ch. 3714, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3714, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-6

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 341, § 6; P.L. 1979, ch. 379, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 61; P.L. 2018, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 293, § 1.

31-3-6.1.
List of vehicles and licenses on which taxes delinquent — Denial of renewal of registration and licenses.

The administrator/division of motor vehicles shall furnish to the Tax Administrator a listing showing the names, addresses and social security numbers of persons whose operator’s license and/or motor vehicle registration is subject to renewal within ninety (90) days. If within ninety (90) days prior to the renewal date the tax administrator determines that any person seeking to renew his/her operator’s license and/or registration has neglected or refused to file any tax returns or to pay any tax administered by the tax administrator and that such tax matter is not pending administrative or appellate review, the tax administrator shall send a written notice to such person informing him/her of the tax administrator’s intention to inform the division of motor vehicles not to renew the person’s operator license and/or motor vehicle registration and of the procedures available to the person to contest that determination.

Within twenty-one (21) days from the date of such notice, the licensee or registrant may request, in writing, a conference with the tax administrator or his/her designee, in order to show proof of payment of all taxes or for the purpose of entering into a time payment agreement for the delinquent taxes satisfactory to the tax administrator.

If upon the expiration of twenty-one (21) days from the date of the notice to the licensee or registrant or, if a conference has been requested, after a conference has been held, the licensee or registrant has not demonstrated to the satisfaction of the tax administrator that he/she has filed all required returns and paid all required taxes, or that the licensee or registrant has not entered into time payment arrangement satisfactory to the tax administrator, the tax administrator shall notify the administrator/division of motor vehicles that the licensee or registrant is delinquent in filing tax returns and/or remitting taxes due. The tax administrator shall send a copy of the notification to the licensee or registrant.

The administrator/division of motor vehicles shall not renew any operator’s license or registration upon expiration thereof until all state taxes, interest and attendant penalties have been paid in full or the licensee or registrant has entered into a time payment agreement satisfactory to the tax administrator.

If the licensee thereafter files an overdue return and/or remits past taxes due or enters into a satisfactory time payment agreement with respect to any and all returns due and taxes payable, the tax administrator shall, within five (5) business days of a licensee’s request, provide the appropriate agency or authority the certificate of good standing specified in §

5-76-5

. Within five (5) business days of receiving such a certificate, the agency or authority shall reinstate, reissue, renew or otherwise extend the licensee’s license.

Payment of tax not an admission. If the licensee or registrant files an overdue return and/or remits past due taxes in order to apply for or renew a license or registration, said late filing and/or payment shall not be an admission of a violation of any criminal tax statute regarding late filing and/or late payment. The tax administrator shall not refer such person to the Attorney General for prosecution based solely upon said late filing and/or payment of past due taxes.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 39, § 2.

31-3-6.1.1.
Denial of registration — Denial of transfer of registration — Failure to file tax returns and/or pay taxes.

On or before October 31 in each year and at least quarterly thereafter, the tax administrator shall furnish the division of motor vehicles, with a list of the names, addresses and social security numbers of persons who have neglected or refused to file a tax return(s) and/or to pay any tax administered by the tax administrator and that there is no administrative or appellate review pending regarding such tax matter.

Thereafter, the tax administrator, at the times and in the manner mutually agreed to by the tax administrator and the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, shall furnish to the division of motor vehicles the names, addresses and social security numbers of those persons whose names appear on that list but who have subsequently filed all required returns and paid all required taxes, interest and attendant penalties in full or entered into a time payment agreement satisfactory to the tax administrator. Upon receipt of said information, said names, addresses and social security numbers of said persons shall be removed from the list.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall not register any motor vehicle or transfer the registration of any motor vehicle for any person whose name appears on a list provided by the tax administrator pursuant to subsection (a) above until all state taxes, interest and attendant penalties have been paid in full and the payment has been certified to the division of motor vehicles by the tax administrator.

If the person thereafter files an overdue return and/or remits past taxes due or enters into a satisfactory time payment agreement with respect to any and all returns due and taxes payable, the tax administrator shall, within five (5) business days of the person’s request, provide the division of motor vehicles with a certificate of good standing specified in §

5-76-5

. Within five (5) business days of receiving such a certificate, the division of motor vehicles shall register or transfer the person’s registration.

If a person files an overdue return and/or remits past due taxes in order to register a motor vehicle or transfer the registration of a motor vehicle, said late filing and/or payment shall not be an admission of a violation of any criminal tax statute regarding late filing and/or late payment. The tax administrator shall not refer such person to the attorney general for prosecution based solely upon said late filing and/or payment of past due taxes.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 12, § 1.

31-3-6.2.
List of vehicles and licenses on which court costs owed delinquent — Denial of renewal of registration and licenses.

The administrator/division of motor vehicles shall furnish to the State Court Administrator a listing showing the names, addresses and social security numbers of persons whose operator’s license and/or motor vehicle registration is subject to renewal within ninety (90) days. If within ninety (90) days prior to the renewal date the state court administrator determines that any person seeking to renew his/her operator’s license and/or registration has neglected or refused to pay any cash assistance benefit overpayments, court costs owed, fines owed, obligations owed or restitution owed, as such terms are defined in §

44-30.1-1

, the state court administrator shall send a written notice to such person informing him/her of the state court administrator’s intention to inform the division of motor vehicles not to renew the person’s operator license and/or motor vehicle registration and of the procedures available to the person to contest the determination. For the purposes of this section, the terms cash assistance benefit overpayments, court costs owed, fines owed, obligations owed or restitution owed by a debtor as defined in §

44-30.1-1

, are referred to as “costs owed”.

Within twenty-one (21) days from the date of such notice, the licensee or registrant may request, in writing, a conference with the state court administrator or his/her designee, in order to show proof of payment of all costs owed or for the purpose of entering into a time payment agreement for the delinquent costs owed satisfactory to the state court administrator.

If upon the expiration of twenty-one (21) days from the date of the notice to the licensee or registrant or, if a conference has been requested, after a conference has been held, the licensee or registrant has not demonstrated to the satisfaction of the state court administrator that he/she has paid all required costs owed or that the licensee or registrant has not entered into time payment arrangement satisfactory to the state court administrator, the state court administrator shall notify the administrator/division of motor vehicles that the licensee or registrant is delinquent in paying costs owed. The state court administrator shall send a copy of the notification to the licensee or registrant.

The administrator/division of motor vehicles shall not renew any operator’s license or registration upon expiration thereof until all costs owed have been paid in full or the licensee or registrant has entered into a time payment agreement satisfactory to the state court administrator.

If the licensee thereafter files an overdue return and/or remits past taxes due or enters into a satisfactory time payment agreement with respect to any and all returns due and taxes payable, the tax administrator shall, within five (5) business days of a licensee’s request, provide the appropriate agency or authority the certificate of good standing specified in §

5-76-5

. Within five (5) business days of receiving such a certificate, the agency or authority shall reinstate, reissue, renew or otherwise extend the licensee’s license.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 39, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 23, § 1.

31-3-6.3.
Unpaid out-of-state toll amounts, administrative fees, and fines — Denial of registration — Denial of transfer of registration — Denial of renewal of registration and licenses.

Upon receipt of a request from another state or other entity with similar tolling authority with which the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority has entered into an agreement providing for the reciprocal treatment of out-of-state toll violators to take action against a toll violator, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority shall conduct an independent review of each toll violation that forms the basis for such request, which shall include a review of photographic, video, or other visual evidence, to determine that the requesting state or other entity with similar tolling authority imposed any toll amounts, administrative fees, and/or fines against the actual registered owner of the motor vehicle.

As part of its independent review, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority shall provide written notice to the registered owner of the motor vehicle in question. The registered owner shall have ten (10) days from the date on the written notice to contact the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority and to provide information, documentation, and any other evidence contesting the requested action against the out-of-state toll violator. Thereafter, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority shall consider all of the information, documentation, and any other evidence provided as part of its independent review.

If after its independent review the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority is satisfied that any toll amounts, administrative fees, and/or fines are properly imposed against the actual registered owner of the motor vehicle and the registered owner could be subject to reporting to the division of motor vehicles pursuant to §

24-12-37

if such toll violations had occurred on tolled projects in this state, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority may report the registered owner to the division of motor vehicles.

The division of motor vehicles shall not renew any operator’s license or registration upon expiration thereof; register any motor vehicle; or transfer the registration of any motor vehicle of any person reported to it pursuant to subsection (c) of this section until any toll amounts, administrative fees, and/or fines owed to the other state or other entity with similar tolling authority have been paid in full or the person has entered into, and is in current compliance with, a repayment agreement with respect to any amounts owed. The Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority shall provide a copy of any notification received from the other state or other entity with similar tolling authority regarding full payment of amounts owed or the existence of a repayment agreement to the division of motor vehicles within five (5) business days of receipt. Within five (5) business days of receiving such notification, the division of motor vehicles shall renew the person’s license and renew, transfer, or issue the person’s registration.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 340, § 1.

31-3-7.
Registration — Indexing of records.

The division of motor vehicles shall file each application received and when satisfied as to its genuineness and regularity, and that the applicant is entitled to register the vehicle, shall register the vehicle and keep a record of it in suitable books or on index cards as follows:

Under a distinctive regulation number assigned to the vehicle;

Alphabetically, under the name of the owner;

Under the motor number if available, otherwise any other identifying number of the vehicle; and

In the discretion of the division of motor vehicles, in any other manner it may deem desirable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-7

; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 26.

31-3-8.
Registration card — Contents.

The division of motor vehicles, upon registering a vehicle, shall issue a registration card. The registration card shall be delivered to the owner and shall contain upon the its face, the date issued, the name and address of the owner, the registration number assigned to the vehicle, and such description of the vehicle as determined by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, and, upon its reverse side, a form for endorsement of notice to the division of motor vehicles upon transfer of the vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-8

.

31-3-9.
Registration card carried in vehicle.

Every registration card shall at all times be carried in the vehicle to which it refers, or shall be carried by the person driving or in control of such vehicle who shall display it upon demand of a proper officer.

The provisions of this section requiring that a registration card be carried in the vehicle to which it refers or by the person driving the vehicle shall not apply to vehicles bearing dealer or bailee registration plates, or when the card is used for the purpose of making a transfer of registration of the vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-9

.

31-3-10.
Issuance of registration plates.

The division of motor vehicles, upon registering a vehicle, shall issue to the owner one fully reflective registration plate for each motorcycle, trailer, semi-trailer, in-transit vehicle, transporter, bailee vehicle, or a dealer vehicle and two (2) fully reflective registration plates for every other motor vehicle. Application for and issuance of so-called commercial registration plates shall be provided at all offices maintained by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles under §

31-2-6

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-10

; P.L. 1970, ch. 108, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 135, § 1.

31-3-11.
Contents of registration plate.

Every registration plate shall have displayed upon it the registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it is issued, the name of the state of Rhode Island, which may be abbreviated “R.I.”, and the year number for which it is issued or the date of its expiration. Registration plates shall also have printed on them the words, “ocean state”.

The provision requiring the printing of the words “ocean state” on these plates shall not pertain to commercial plates or to plates issued to recipients of the Purple Heart.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-11

; P.L. 1971, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 345, § 1.

31-3-11.1.
Permanent registration and plates.

Every vehicle owned by the state of Rhode Island and any fire apparatus for which no fee is assessed shall be issued permanent registration and registration plates. The permanent registration and plates shall remain on the vehicles to which they are assigned without expiration until the vehicle is replaced or disposed of.

This section does not apply to certain vehicles owned by state law enforcement agencies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 39, § 1.

31-3-12.
Visibility of plates.

Each registration plate and the required letters and numerals on it, except the year number for which issued, shall be of sufficient size to be plainly readable from a distance of one hundred feet (100´) during daylight. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-12

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 103.

31-3-13.
Plates for rental or leased vehicles.

The division of motor vehicles shall issue for every passenger motor vehicle rented or leased without a driver, the same type of registration plates as the type of plates issued for private passenger vehicles. However, if the renter or lessee uses his or her own registration plate on the rented or leased vehicle, that registration plate shall be promptly returned to him or her upon termination of the rental or lease agreement. Should the registration plate not be returned, the division of motor vehicles may be notified by the renter or lessor and the registration shall be cancelled by the division of motor vehicles and the registration plate shall be reissued to the person who rented or leased the motor vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-13

; P.L. 1986, ch. 223, § 1.

31-3-14.
Bailee and in transit plates.

Bailee plates. The division of motor vehicles shall issue plates designated as “bailee plates” to garages, automobile repairers, or any person in the business requiring repossession of motor vehicles, trailers, or semitrailers.

In transit plates. The division of motor vehicles shall issue plates designated as “in transit” plates for use on special mobile equipment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-14

; P.L. 1959, ch. 123, § 2.

31-3-15.
Special plates for state officers and mayors.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles has the right to issue a special registration plate for the use of the governor, the lieutenant governor, the secretary of state, the attorney general, the state treasurer, the president pro tem of the senate, the speaker of the house, and mayors of Rhode Island cities. The plates will be furnished without additional cost. If mayors of Rhode Island cities choose to use city motor vehicle registration plates, the mayors may place on the plates the official seals of the respective city in a manner that does not obstruct the numbering or lettering.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue, in addition to a regular registration plate, a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of each former speaker of the house of representatives, each former majority and minority leader of the house of representatives, and of each former majority and minority leader of the senate and president of the senate. Each of these plates is to bear the identification “house speaker emeritus”, “house majority leader emeritus”, “house minority leader emeritus”, “senate majority leader emeritus”, “senate minority leader emeritus”, or “senate president emeritus” with a seal of the state imprinted on the plate and shall be financed without additional registration charge for a period of time as each former speaker and senate majority leader and president of the senate desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-15

; P.L. 1974, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 430, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 350, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 65; P.L. 2006, ch. 310, § 1.

31-3-16.
General assembly plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is directed to make available to each duly elected member of the senate and of the house of representatives of the general assembly of the state of Rhode Island, so long as the member is serving during the term for which he or she has been elected as a member of the general assembly and no longer, two (2) special motor vehicle registration plates carrying on the first plate as a courtesy the word “senate” in the case of the senate, and the word “house” in the case of the house of representatives. On the second set of plates, in addition to the wording above, the letter “a” denoting auxiliary shall be placed on the plates. The plates are to have special identifying numbers corresponding to the number of the senatorial or representative district from which the member was elected.

The special motor vehicle registration plates shall carry thereon the design and the seal of the state of Rhode Island and shall be designed, sold, and attached to the motor vehicle without cost to the state.

Each member of any general assembly, at the expiration of his or her term as member, unless reelected, may retain the special motor vehicle registration plates in his or her own keeping, provided he or she does not display the plates upon any motor vehicle or any other form of transportation owned or operated by the member.

Any violation of the provisions of subsection (c) of this section shall be deemed a civil violation, and any person displaying a special motor vehicle registration plate upon any vehicle shall, upon conviction, be fined ten dollars ($10.00) for each offense.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall reserve for the future use of each member of the general assembly the private registration plates which he or she turns into the division of motor vehicles in return for legislator’s plates. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall annually, during the month of January, submit a written notice to each member of the general assembly notifying him or her of the private registration plates which are being reserved for his or her future use. The notice shall indicate the registration plate designation and the legislator for which it is being reserved.

In a state of emergency, any member of the general assembly driving a vehicle bearing a special motor vehicle registration plate shall be authorized and empowered to travel upon the highways of the state notwithstanding any driving ban imposed by any state or municipal authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 8; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-16

; P.L. 1967, ch. 6, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 13, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 381, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 310, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 1.

31-3-17.
Volunteer fire company plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall, upon approved application, issue annually to any member of any duly incorporated volunteer fire company in this state, so long as he or she remains a member of the volunteer fire company, a special identifying number plate which shall be attached to the motor vehicle of the member of the volunteer fire company in conjunction with the regular number plates assigned to the member of the fire company at the time of the registration of the vehicle. There shall be a one time charge of ten dollars ($10.00) for these special number plates, of which five dollars ($5.00) shall be deposited to the division of motor vehicles manufacturing account. The member of the volunteer fire company shall attach and display the special identifying number plate in accordance with such rules and regulations as the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall promulgate.

The design of the plates shall be provided by the Rhode Island Association of Fire Chiefs, and shall be approved by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

Every plate issued shall bear an individual number to identify the vehicle to which it is attached. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to promulgate any rules and regulations that are required in determining the manner by which the individual numbers will be selected and issued.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-17

; P.L. 1992, ch. 38, § 1.